Louisiana, session 2026, SB106.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 44:4(65) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§4. Applicability
This Chapter shall not apply:
* * *
(65) To a copy of any audio recording, image, video, or photograph in the
custody of a clerk of court after it is introduced into evidence of a criminal
prosecution and which is determined by the clerk to depict: an autopsy, dead
body, sexual assault, gruesome injury, obscene act, a juvenile victim, a victim's
genitals, pubic hair, anus, vulva, or female breast, or any patently offensive
sexual act, unless such image, video, or photograph is voluntarily released,
otherwise available to the general public, or released by court order.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.